Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,250.01
Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Certification and Registration Cash Fund; created; investment.

The Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Certification and Registration Cash Fund is created. Fees collected pursuant to sections 81-15,247 and 81-15,248 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. The fund shall be administered by the department. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2007, LB333, § 7.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.